Utah statutes.
4-39-203.   License required to operate a domesticated elk facility.

(1)  A person may not operate a domesticated elk facility without first obtaining a license from the department.

(2) (a)  Each application for a license to operate a domesticated elk facility shall be accompanied by a fee.

(b)  The fee shall be established by the department in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(3)  Each applicant for a domesticated elk facility license shall submit an application providing all information in the form and manner as required by the department.

(4) (a)  No license shall be issued until the department has inspected and approved the facility.

(b)  The department shall:

(i)  notify the Division of Wildlife Resources at least 48 hours prior to a scheduled inspection so that a Division of Wildlife Resources representative may be present at the inspection; and

(ii)  provide the Division of Wildlife Resources with copies of all licensing and inspection reports.

(5)  Each separate location of the domesticated elk operation shall be licensed separately.

(6) (a)  If a domesticated elk facility is operated under more than one business name from a single location, the name of each operation shall be listed with the department in the form and manner required by the department.

(b)  The department shall require that a separate fee be paid for each business name listed.

(c)  If a domesticated elk facility operates under more than one business name from a single location, the facility shall maintain separate records.

(7)  Each person or business entity with an equity interest in the domesticated elk shall be listed on the application for license.

(8)  Each domesticated elk facility license shall expire on July 1 in the year following the year of issuance.

(9)  Each licensee shall report to the department, in the form and manner required by the department, any change in the information provided in the licensee's application or in the reports previously submitted, within 15 days of each change.

(10)  Licenses issued pursuant to this section are not transferable.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

